Hawaii statutes.
§109-1 Stadium authority; appointment,
terms. (a) There shall be within the department of accounting and general
services for administrative purposes only, a stadium authority whose
responsibility shall be to maintain, operate, and manage the stadium and
facilities attached thereto. The authority shall consist of nine members who
shall be appointed by the governor in the manner prescribed by section 26-34.
Each member of the authority shall have been a citizen of the United States and
a resident of the State for at least five years next preceding the member's
appointment. The president of the University of Hawaii and the superintendent
of education shall be ex officio members of the authority but shall not vote.

(b) The chairperson of the authority shall be
elected by the majority of the authority. The term of each member shall be
four years, provided that of the members initially appointed three members
shall serve for four years, three members shall serve for three years and the
remaining three members shall serve for two years. No person shall be
appointed consecutively to more than two terms as a member of the authority.
Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of any unexpired term in the same
manner as original appointments.

(c) The members of the authority shall serve
without compensation and shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties. [L 1970, c 172, §1; am L 1971, c
125, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 302, pt of §2; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 1999, c 160,
§7; am L 2016, c 61, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next